Missouri, session 2026, HB2486.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 278.070, 278.080, and 278.120, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 278.070, 278.080, and 278.120,
to read as follows:
278.070. As used in sections 278.060 to 278.300, the following words and terms
mean:
(1) "Board of soil and water district supervisors" or "soil and water supervisors", the
local governing body of a soil and water district, elected or appointed in accordance with the
provisions of this law;
(2) "Healthy soils practices", agricultural practices that:
(a) Improve the health of soils including, but not limited to, consideration of
depth of topsoil horizons, water infiltration rate, water holding capacity, organic matter
content, biologically accessible nutrient content, bulk density, biological activity, and
biological and microbiological diversity;
(b) Follow the principles of:
a. Keeping soil covered;
b. Minimizing soil disturbance and external inputs;
c. Maximizing biodiversity;
d. Maximizing presence of living roots;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2486 2
e. Integrating animals into land management including, but not limited to,
grazing animals, birds, or beneficial insects or keystone species such as earthworms;
and
f. Incorporating the context of local conditions in decision-making, such as soil
type, topography, and time of year;
(c) Are achieved through conservation tillage or no-till, cover-cropping,
perennialization of highly erodible land, precision nitrogen and phosphorus
application, managed grazing, integrated crop-livestock systems, silvopasture,
agroforestry, perennial crops, integrated pest management, or nutrient best
management practices; and
(d) Are recommended by the United States Department of Agriculture Natural
Resources Conservation Service Field Office Technical Guide and that are supported by
the department of natural resources;
(3) "Land representative", the owner or representative authorized by power of
attorney of any farm lying within any area proposed to be established, and subsequently
established, as a soil and water district under the provisions of [this law] sections 278.060 to
278.155, and for the purposes of sections 278.060 to 278.155 each such farm shall be entitled
to representation by a land representative; provided, however, that any land representative
must be a taxpayer of the county within which the soil and water district is located;
[(3)] (4) "Landowner", any person, firm or corporation who holds title to any lands
lying within a district organized or to be organized under the provisions of this chapter. Any
landowner may be represented by notarized proxy not more than one year old;
[(4)] (5) "Soil and water conservation cost-share program", a state-funded incentive
program designed for the purpose of saving, protecting, and restoring the soil and
[protecting the] water [resources] and improving soil health and watershed health of the
state to preserve and enhance the productive power of Missouri agricultural land;
[(5)] (6) "Soil and water conservation district" or "soil and water district", a county or
one or more of its townships wherein a project for saving the soil and water or improving
soil health and watershed health has been established with the authority and duty and
subject to the restrictions herein set forth; and in establishing a soil and water district, if the
proposed area is less than the area of the county which contains it, but greater than the area of
one township, the additional township or townships to be included in such soil and water
district need not be contiguous with the first township or with one another, but there shall be
only one soil and water district within the boundaries of the same county; and any farm
intersected by a soil and water district boundary shall be considered as lying within that
district for purposes of soil and water conservation by that district, except that the soil and
water conservation of a farm which lies partly within one soil and water district and partly

HB 2486 3
within another shall be considered the duty of the soil and water district in which the home
buildings of such farm are located;
(7) "Soil health", the overall composition of the soil, including the amount of
organic matter in and water holding capacity of the soil and the continued capacity of
the soil to function as a vital living ecosystem that sustains plants, animals, and humans;
[(6)] (8) "State soil and water districts commission" or "soil and water commission",
the agency created by section 278.080 for the administration of the soil and water
conservation districts provided for by sections 278.060 to 278.155;
[(7)] (9) "Subdistrict", "watershed", or "watershed district", as used in sections
278.160 to 278.300, a watershed district, with the exception of section 278.160, whereby
subdistrict is specifically used to describe the relationship to an established soil and water
conservation district or districts that may be established as a watershed district;
[(8)] (10) "Township", municipal township and not congressional or survey township;
(11) "Watershed health", the continued capacity of a surface and groundwater
ecosystem to function as a vital living ecosystem that is resilient to drought and storm
events and that sustains plants, animals, and humans.
278.080. 1. There is hereby established "The State Soil and Water Districts
Commission" to administer for this state the soil and water conservation districts provided for
by sections 278.060 to 278.300. The state soil and water districts commission shall formulate
policies and general programs for the saving of Missouri soil and water and improving soil
health and watershed health by the soil and water conservation districts, and shall give
consideration to the districts' needs based on their character[; it]. The commission shall
receive and allocate or otherwise expend for the use or benefit of the soil and water
conservation districts any funds appropriated by the general assembly for the use or benefit of
such districts, including a soil and water conservation cost-share program[; it]. The
commissionshall receive and properly convey to the soil and water conservation districts any
other form of aid extended to such districts by any other agency of this state, except that any
money or other form of aid raised or provided within a soil and water district for the use or
benefit of that soil and water district shall be received and administered by the governing
body of that soil and water district[; it]. The commission shall exercise other authority
conferred upon it and perform other duties assigned to it by sections 278.060 to 278.300[; and
it]. The commission shall be the administrative agency to represent this state in these and all
other matters arising from the provisions of sections 278.060 to 278.300.
2. The state soil and water districts commission shall be composed of four ex officio
members and six farmer members. The six farmer members shall be appointed by the
governor of Missouri with the advice and consent of the senate. Three of the farmer members
shall reside in the portion of this state which is north of the Missouri River and three of the

HB 2486 4
farmer members shall reside in the portion of this state which is south of the Missouri River.
At least three of the farmer members shall demonstrate competency in healthy soils
practices. The membership shall be geographically dispersed with no more than one of the
farmer members appointed from a state senatorial district. Not more than four of the farmer
members shall be from the same political party. The ex officio members shall be the director
of the department of natural resources, the director of the department of agriculture, the
director of the department of conservation, and the dean of the college of agriculture of the
University of Missouri. Each of the six farmer members shall be holding legal title to a farm,
and shall be earning at least the principal part of the member's livelihood from a farm, all at
the time of appointment to the commission. The farmer members shall each be appointed for
a period of three years. [All members of the commission serving as of June 27, 2000, may
continue to serve the unexpired portion of the member's current term.] There is no limitation
on the number of terms that any of the farmer members appointed by the governor may serve.
If any farmer member vacates his or her term for any reason prior to the expiration of such
term, the governor may appoint a farmer member to serve for the remainder of the unexpired
term. Each member of the commission shall continue to serve until the member's successor
has been duly appointed and qualified.
3. The state soil and water districts commission may call upon the attorney general of
the state for such legal services as it may require.
4. At its first meeting in each calendar year, the state soil and water districts
commission shall select from its current members a [chairman] chair and a vice [chairman]
chair. The ex officio members shall not have the power to vote on any matter before the
commission. A quorum shall consist of four farmer members. For the determination of any
matter within the commission's authority, at a meeting comprised of four farmer members, a
concurrence of three shall be required. No business of the commission shall be executed in
absence of a quorum. Each farmer member of the soil and water commission shall be entitled
to expenses, including travel expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of his or her
duties as a member of this commission. The state soil and water districts commission shall
provide for the execution of surety bonds for all of its employees and officers who shall be
entrusted with funds or property; shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of
all its proceedings and of all its resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted; and
shall provide for an annual audit of all its accounts of receipts and disbursements.
5. In addition to the authority and duty herein assigned to the state soil and water
districts commission, it shall have the following authority and duty:
(1) To encourage the formation of soil and water conservation districts in areas where
their establishment seems necessary and their administration seems feasible;

HB 2486 5
(2) To formulate and fix the rules and procedures for fair and impartial referendums
on the establishing or disestablishment of soil and water districts and for fair and impartial
selection of soil and water district supervisors;
(3) To receive petitions for the establishing of soil and water conservation districts as
provided in section 278.100; to determine the validity of these petitions; to conduct hearings
upon the subject of these petitions; to determine whether the establishment of a soil and water
district as petitioned would be effective in the saving of soil and water within the proposed
area, and whether a soil and water district if established could be feasibly administered; and,
upon reaching a favorable conclusion on these matters, to call for a referendum on the
establishing of the soil and water district as petitioned;
(4) To advise any soil and water conservation district in developing its program for
saving the soil and water and improving soil health and watershed health, water quality,
groundwater supply, storm water mitigation, flood control, drought resilience, and crop
security in order that such district may become eligible for any form of aid from state or
federal sources;
(5) Subject to district allocations by the commission and other resources, to provide
training, programs and other assistance to soil and water conservation districts to identify
programs that respond to the character of the districts' needs;
(6) To obtain or accept the cooperation and financial, technical or material assistance
of the United States or any of its agencies, and of this state or any of its agencies, for the work
of such soil and water districts;
(7) To enter into agreements with the United States or any of its agencies on policies
and general programs for the saving of Missouri soil and water and improving soil health
and watershed health, water quality, groundwater supply, storm water mitigation, flood
control, drought resilience, and crop securityby the extension of federal aid to any soil and
water conservation district; to advise any soil and water conservation district; to advise any
soil and water conservation district on the amount or kind of federal aid needed for the
effective saving of soil and water in that district; to determine within the limits of available
funds or other resources the amount or kind of state aid to be used for saving of soil and water
and improving soil health and watershed health, water quality, groundwater supply,
storm water mitigation, flood control, drought resilience, and crop security in any soil
and water conservation district; and to determine the withholding of state aid of any amount
or kind from any soil and water conservation district that has failed to follow the policies of
the state soil and water districts commission in any matter under the provisions of sections
278.060 to 278.300;
(8) To give such other proper assistance as the soil and water commission may judge
to be useful to any soil and water district in the saving of soil and water and improving soil

HB 2486 6
health and watershed health, water quality, groundwater supply, storm water
mitigation, flood control, drought resilience, and crop security in that district;
(9) To promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectively
administer a state-funded soil and water conservation cost-share program. Any rule or
portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of sections 278.060 to 278.300 shall become
100 effective only if it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536.
101 6. Unless prohibited by any federal or state law, the commission may grant individual
102 variances to any rule or regulation promulgated thereto, upon presentation of adequate proof,
103 that compliance with sections 278.070 to 278.300, or any rule or regulation, standard,
104 requirement, limitation or order of the commission will have an arbitrary and unreasonable
105 impact on landowners participating in soil and water conservation eligible and healthy soils
106 practices. The commission shall promulgate such rules, regulations and administrative
107 guidelines as necessary to effectively administer this section.
278.120. 1. Any soil and water district organized under the provisions of [this law]
sections 278.060 to 278.155 shall be a body corporate and shall possess only such powers as
herein provided, but any such powers possessed by said body corporate shall be particularly
limited by the following provisos: provided, that the private property of any land
representative or owner of property in such soil and water district shall be exempt from
execution for the debts of the body corporate or soil and water district and no land
representative or owner of property within said soil and water district shall be liable or
responsible for any debts of the body corporate or soil and water district, and provided
further, that no property of any character, title to which is not vested in said soil and water
district, or a soil and water district, as the case may be, shall ever be subject to any lien for
any claim or judgment of or against said district, or a soil and water district as the case may
be. Any soil and water district so organized shall be officially known and titled "The Soil and
Water District of ______ County", and shall be so designated by the county commission by
order of record, and in that name shall be capable of suing and being sued and of contracting
and being contracted with.
2. A soil and water district through the board of soil and water district supervisors
thereof shall have the following authority and duty in addition to other authority and duty
granted in other sections of this law:
(1) To promote all reasonable measures for the saving of the soil and water and
improving soil health and watershed health, water quality, groundwater supply, storm
water mitigation, flood control, drought resilience, and crop security within that soil and
water district; and all such measures shall be in general agreement with those currently
advocated by the college of agriculture of the University of Missouri for saving the
productive power of Missouri farm land;

HB 2486 7
(2) To cooperate or enter into agreements with, and to aid within the limits of
appropriations duly made available to it by law, any agency, government or otherwise, or any
land representative within that soil and water district, in the saving of the soil and water and
improving soil health and watershed health, water quality, groundwater supply, storm
water mitigation, flood control, drought resilience, and crop security within that district;
and all such cooperations or agreements shall be in accord with the policies of the state soil
and water districts commission; and any land representative of farm land within that soil and
water district shall be eligible to enter into such cooperations or agreements with the soil and
water supervisors; and no program or procedure of soil and water conservation shall be
ordered or executed by the soil and water supervisors on any farm without the full consent
and agreement of the land representative of that farm;
(3) To make available to any land representative within that soil and water district,
through existing agencies if agreements with them seem feasible, or by such other feasible
means as the supervisors shall prescribe, such services, materials, and equipment as will assist
such land representatives to carry on operations for the saving of the soil and water;
(4) To accept grants, gifts, and contributions in money, services, or materials from the
United States or any of its agencies, and to use or expend such grants, gifts or contributions in
carrying on the soil and water district operations; and such use or expenditure shall be in
accord with the policies of the state soil and water districts commission;
(5) To make and execute contracts and other legal instruments, necessary for the
saving of the soil and water in that district, subject to approval by the state soil and water
districts commission;
(6) To accept for the purpose of saving soil and water and improving soil health and
watershed health, water quality, groundwater supply, storm water mitigation, flood
control, drought resilience, and crop security in that district, contributions in money,
services or materials from any source not otherwise provided for herein, and to enter into such
agreements with land representatives as will tend to prevent future wastage of the soil and
water and tend to ensure future improvement of the soil health and watershed health,
water quality, groundwater supply, storm water mitigation, flood control, drought
resilience, and crop security presently benefitted by these contributions.
✔